North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 46. Temporary Custody; Secure and Nonsecure Custody; Custody Hearings. [Repealed]

§§ 7A-571 through 7A-577.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-202, s. 5.

Cross References.

For temporary custody, nonsecure custody, and custody hearings under the Juvenile Code, effective July 1, 1999, see now

G.S. 7B-500

et seq.

§ 7A-577.1.

Recodified as

G.S. 7B-507

.

§§ 7A-578 through 7A-583.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-202, s. 5.